Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.330

Postconsumer recycled content in plastic trash bags—Purchasing priority.

(1) Beginning July 1, 2024, all state agencies may only purchase plastic trash bags manufactured by producers that comply with the minimum recycled content requirements established in RCW 70A.245.020.

(2) By July 1, 2024, the department of ecology shall provide to the department a list of the plastic trash bag producer brands that comply with the minimum recycled content requirements established in RCW 70A.245.020, in order for state agencies to purchase compliant products, updated annually.

[ 2021 c 313 s 8.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 313: See note following RCW 70A.245.010.